Hawaii statutes.
§431:15-103.5 Standards and
authority. (a) The following standards, either singly or in a combination
of two or more, may be considered by the commissioner to determine whether the
continued operation of any insurer transacting insurance business in this State
may be deemed to be hazardous to its policyholders, its creditors, or the
general public:

(1) Adverse findings reported in financial condition
and market conduct examination reports, audit reports, and actuarial opinions,
reports, or summaries;

(2) The National Association of Insurance
Commissioners' insurance regulatory information system and its other financial
analysis solvency tools and reports;

(3) Whether the insurer has made adequate provision,
according to presently accepted actuarial standards of practice, for the
anticipated cash flows required by the contractual obligations and related
expenses of the insurer, when considered in light of the assets held by the
insurer with respect to the reserves and related actuarial items, including the
investment earnings on the assets, and the considerations anticipated to be
received and retained under the policies and contracts;

(4) The ability of an assuming reinsurer to perform
and whether the insurer's reinsurance program provides sufficient protection
for the insurer's remaining surplus after taking into account the insurer's
cash flow and the classes of business written as well as the financial
condition of the assuming reinsurer;

(5) Whether the insurer's operating loss in the last
twelve-month period or any shorter period of time, including but not limited to
net capital gain or loss, change in non-admitted assets, and cash dividends
paid to shareholders, is greater than fifty per cent of the insurer's remaining
surplus as regards policyholders in excess of the minimum required;

(6) Whether the insurer's operating loss in the last
twelve-month period or any shorter period of time, excluding net capital gains,
is greater than twenty per cent of the insurer's remaining surplus as regards
policyholders in excess of the minimum required;

(7) Whether a reinsurer, obligor, or any entity
within the insurer's insurance holding company system is insolvent, threatened
with insolvency, or delinquent in payment of its monetary or other obligations
and which in the opinion of the commissioner may affect the solvency of the
insurer;

(8) Contingent liabilities, pledges, or guaranties
that, either individually or collectively, involve a total amount that, in the
opinion of the commissioner, may affect the solvency of the insurer;

(9) Whether any "controlling person" of an
insurer is delinquent in the transmitting to, or payment of, net premiums to
the insurer;

(10) The age and collectibility of receivables;

(11) Whether management of an insurer, including
officers, directors, or any other person who directly or indirectly controls
the operation of the insurer, fails to possess and demonstrate the competence,
fitness, and reputation deemed necessary to serve the insurer in such position;

(12) Whether management of an insurer has failed to
respond to inquiries relative to the condition of the insurer or has furnished
false and misleading information concerning an inquiry;

(13) Whether the insurer has failed to meet financial
and holding company filing requirements in the absence of a reason satisfactory
to the commissioner;

(14) Whether management of an insurer either has filed
any false or misleading sworn financial statement, or has released any false or
misleading financial statement to lending institutions or to the general
public, or has made a false or misleading entry, or has omitted an entry of
material amount in the books of the insurer;

(15) Whether the insurer has grown so rapidly and to
such an extent that it lacks adequate financial and administrative capacity to
meet its obligations in a timely manner;

(16) Whether the company has experienced, or will
experience in the foreseeable future, cash flow or liquidity problems;

(17) Whether management has established reserves that
do not comply with minimum standards established by state insurance laws,
regulations, statutory accounting standards, sound actuarial principles, and
standards of practice;

(18) Whether management persistently engages in
material under reserving that results in adverse development;

(19) Whether transactions among affiliates,
subsidiaries, or controlling persons for which the insurer receives assets or
capital gains, or both, do not provide sufficient value, liquidity, or
diversity to assure the insurer's ability to meet its outstanding obligations
as they mature; and

(20) Any other finding determined by the commissioner
to be hazardous to the insurer's policyholders, creditors, or the general
public.

(b) For the purposes of making a determination
of an insurer's financial condition under this part, the commissioner may:

(1) Disregard any credit or amount receivable
resulting from transactions with a reinsurer that is insolvent, impaired, or
otherwise subject to a delinquency proceeding;

(2) Make appropriate adjustments including
disallowance to asset values attributable to investments in or transactions
with parents, subsidiaries, or affiliates consistent with the National
Association of Insurance Commissioners' accounting practices and procedures
manual, state laws, and rules;

(3) Refuse to recognize the stated value of accounts
receivable if the ability to collect receivables is highly speculative in view
of the age of the account or the financial condition of the debtor; or

(4) Increase the insurer's liability in an amount
equal to any contingent liability, pledge, or guarantee not otherwise included
if there is a substantial risk that the insurer will be called upon to meet the
obligation undertaken within the next twelve-month period.

(c) If the commissioner determines that the
continued operation of the insurer licensed to transact business in this State
may be hazardous to its policyholders, its creditors, or the general public,
the commissioner may, upon the commissioner's determination, issue an order
requiring the insurer to:

(1) Reduce the total amount of present and potential
liability for policy benefits by reinsurance;

(2) Reduce, suspend, or limit the volume of business
being accepted or renewed;

(3) Reduce general insurance and commission expenses
by specified methods;

(4) Increase the insurer's capital and surplus;

(5) Suspend or limit the declaration and payment of
dividends by an insurer to its stockholders or to its policyholders;

(6) File reports in a form acceptable to the
commissioner concerning the market value of the insurer's assets;

(7) Limit or withdraw from certain investments or
discontinue certain investment practices to the extent the commissioner deems
necessary;

(8) Document the adequacy of premium rates in
relation to the risks insured;

(9) File, in addition to regular annual statements,
interim financial reports on the form adopted by the National Association of
Insurance Commissioners or on such forms as approved by the commissioner;

(10) Correct corporate governance practice
deficiencies and adopt and utilize governance practices acceptable to the
commissioner;

(11) Provide a business plan to the commissioner in
order to continue to transact business in the State; or

(12) Notwithstanding any other provision of law
limiting the frequency or amount of premium rate adjustments, adjust rates for
any non-life insurance product written by the insurer that the commissioner
considers necessary to improve the financial condition of the insurer.

If the insurer is a foreign insurer, the
commissioner's order may be limited to the extent provided by statute.

(d) Any insurer subject to an order under
subsection (c) may request a hearing to review that order pursuant to chapter
91. [L 1993, c 321, §3; am L 2013, c 190, §3]

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next